Hawaii statutes.
§515-4 Exemptions. (a) Section 515-3
does not apply:

(1) To the rental of a housing accommodation in a
building which contains housing accommodations for not more than two families
living independently of each other if the owner or lessor resides in one of the
housing accommodations; or

(2) To the rental of a room or up to four rooms in a
housing accommodation by an owner or lessor if the owner or lessor resides in
the housing accommodation.

(b) Nothing in section 515-3 shall be deemed
to prohibit refusal, because of sex, including gender identity or expression,
sexual orientation, or marital status, to rent or lease housing accommodations:

(1) Owned or operated by a religious institution and
used for church purposes as that term is used in applying exemptions for real
property taxes; or

(2) Which are part of a religiously affiliated
institution of higher education housing program which is operated on property
that the institution owns or controls, or which is operated for its students
pursuant to Title IX of the Higher Education Act of 1972.

(c) Nothing in this chapter regarding familial
status or age shall apply to housing for older persons as defined by title 42
United States Code Section 3607(b)(2). [L 1967, c 193, §4; HRS §515-4; gen ch
1985; am L 1990, c 275, §4; am L 1992, c 171, §4; am L 1993, c 140, §1; am L
2005, c 214, §4; am L 2011, c 31, §3]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next